Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 4

Miscellaneous

4-1-401. Standard time — Observation of advancement of time — Observation of year-round daylight savings time.

There shall be observed in each and every part of this state only standard time as fixed for such area by the United States department of transportation. No town, city, municipal corporation, taxing district, county or other governmental subdivision shall possess power to adopt permanently or temporarily or from time to time any other standard of time to be observed than as prescribed by this subsection (a). All municipal ordinances, resolutions or other forms of enactment by any body of the nature mentioned in this subsection (a) in conflict with this section are hereby nullified and made of no effect, whether enacted prior or subsequent to the effective date of this section.

No person, firm, partnership, corporation or other entity operating or maintaining a place of business of whatsoever kind or nature shall employ, display or maintain or use any other standard of time in connection with such place of business than standard time as prescribed by this section. No radio or television station doing business in this state shall operate on, announce, employ, display, maintain or use any other standard of time than standard time as prescribed by this section.

Whoever shall in connection with any place of business of whatsoever kind or nature employ, display, announce, operate on, maintain or use any other than standard time as prescribed by this section commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each day of such violation constitutes a separate offense.

This state shall observe the advancement of time provided in 15 U.S.C. § 260a at all times throughout the year, and daylight saving time will be the standard time of the entire state and all of its political subdivisions upon compliance with the following conditions:

The United States congress amending or repealing 15 U.S.C. § 260a to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year round;

The commissioner of transportation certifying in writing to the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives the congressional action described in subdivision (d)(1)(A); and

The general assembly, by joint resolution, confirming the congressional action described in subdivision (d)(1)(A) and authorizing the implementation of the state's observation of daylight saving time year round.

The observation of year-round daylight saving time will begin the first Sunday of November following compliance with the requirements of subdivision (d)(1).

Acts 1949, ch. 5, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5755.33 (Williams, § 11.1); Acts 1957, ch. 260, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-113; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2019, ch. 416, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

4-1-402. Due dates falling on Saturday or Sunday.

Whenever the due date for filing any schedule, form or return with any state department or agency or for paying any tax due the state occurs on a Saturday or Sunday, the taxpayer shall have until the close of business hours for such department or agency on the following Monday to file such schedule, form or return or to pay such tax.

Acts 1974, ch. 439, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-119.

4-1-403. Appointments to state boards or commissions — Age discrimination prohibited.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person meeting all other requirements shall not be ineligible for appointment or reappointment to any state board or commission because of age.

Acts 1973, ch. 120, § 3; 1977, ch. 8, § 1; T.C.A. § 4-115.

4-1-404. English — Official and legal language.

English is hereby established as the official and legal language of Tennessee. All communications and publications, including ballots, produced by governmental entities in Tennessee shall be in English, and instruction in the public schools and colleges of Tennessee shall be conducted in English unless the nature of the course would require otherwise.

Acts 1984, ch. 821, § 1.

Cross-References. Notice in English, §48-51-202.

Refusal to register documents not in English, §66-24-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Dissemination of information by governmental agencies in languages other than English, OAG 07-112 (7/25/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112.

4-1-405. Use of certain symbols, mascots and names.

The general assembly recognizes that many Tennessee institutions, both public and private, have elected to select symbols, mascots, and names to represent those institutions. The symbols, mascots, and names are often chosen in recognition of the area's heritage and to honor and respect certain persons or cultures and their contributions to our citizens and our state.

No state agency has the authority to require or to prohibit or impair in any way the right of any public or private institution to continue to honor certain persons or cultures through the use of symbols, mascots and names.

Acts 2007, ch. 371, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. To the extent the Tennessee human rights commission might seek to prohibit or limit the use of a name, symbol or mascot, T.C.A. §4-1-405 prohibits the commission from taking such an action, OAG 07-132 (8/30/07), 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 132.

4-1-406. Flag display protocol — Display for soldiers killed in line of duty.

Whenever the official United States flag or the official state flag is displayed, appropriate flag display protocol requires that when flown on the same pole on property owned, operated or controlled by the state or any political subdivision of the state, including all educational institutions, the order of placement from top to bottom shall be the official United States flag, the official state flag, and any other flags.

As used in this subsection (b):

“County” includes, but is not limited to, any county having a metropolitan form of government;

“Member of the armed services” or “member” means a citizen of Tennessee who is a member of the armed forces of the United States, or a member of a reserve or Tennessee national guard unit who is called into active military service of the United States, as defined in § 58-1-102, and is stationed outside the United States during hostilities in which military personnel are entitled to combat compensation as determined by the United States department of defense; and

“Political subdivision” means county or municipality.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in the event a member of the armed services, while serving honorably, is killed in action or dies as a direct result of injuries sustained from a service connected, combat-related cause, the governor shall proclaim a state-wide day of mourning and shall order the state flag to be flown at half-staff over the state capitol during such period of mourning.

The governor or the governor's designee shall notify the executive official of the political subdivision in which such member of the armed services resided of the deceased member's identity and the date of the day of mourning declared pursuant to subdivision (b)(2). The executive official of the political subdivision, or such official's designee, shall order any state flag hoisted on the property of the political subdivision to be flown at half-staff during such day of mourning.

The names of all members of the armed services for whom a state-wide day of mourning is declared pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) shall be recorded in the journals of the senate and the house of representatives.

Acts 2007, ch. 394, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1; 2011, ch. 8, § 1.

4-1-407. Preservation of religious freedom.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Demonstrates” means meets the burdens of going forward with the evidence and of persuasion under the standard of clear and convincing evidence;

“Exercise of religion” means the exercise of religion under the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 3 and the first amendment to the United States Constitution;

“Fraudulent claim” means a claim that is dishonest in fact or that is made principally for a patently improper purpose, such as to harass the opposing party;

“Frivolous claim” means a claim that completely lacks merit under existing law and cannot be supported by a good faith argument for the extension, modification or reversal of existing law or the establishment of new law;

“Government entity” means any branch, department, agency, commission or instrumentality of state government, any official or other person acting under color of state law or any political subdivision of the state;

“Prevails” means to obtain “prevailing party” status as defined by courts construing the federal Civil Rights Attorney's Fees Awards Act of 1976 (42 U.S.C. § 1988); and

“Substantially burden” means to inhibit or curtail religiously motivated practice.

Except as provided in subsection (c), no government entity shall substantially burden a person's free exercise of religion even if the burden results from a rule of general applicability.

No government entity shall substantially burden a person's free exercise of religion unless it demonstrates that application of the burden to the person is:

Essential to further a compelling governmental interest; and

The least restrictive means of furthering that compelling governmental interest.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Authorize any government entity to burden any religious belief; or

Affect, interpret or in any way address those portions of the Constitution of Tennessee, Article I, § 3 and the first amendment to the United States Constitution that prohibit laws respecting the establishment of religion.

Nothing in this section shall create or preclude a right of any religious organization to receive funding or other assistance from a government or of any person to receive government funding for a religious activity.

A person whose religious exercise has been burdened by government in violation of this section may assert that violation as a claim or defense in any judicial or administrative proceeding and may obtain such declaratory relief, monetary damages as may properly be awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction, or both declaratory relief and monetary damages. A person who prevails in any proceeding to enforce this section against a government entity may recover the person's reasonable costs and attorney's fees. Standing to assert a claim or defense under this section shall be governed by general rules of law that establish standing. This subsection (e) relating to attorney's fees shall not apply to criminal prosecutions.

Any person found by a court with jurisdiction over the action to have abused the protections of this section by filing a frivolous or fraudulent claim may be assessed the government entity's court costs, if any, and may be enjoined from filing further claims under this section without leave of court.

A government entity, excluding courts, shall not subpoena a clergy member's sermon, including notes used to prepare a sermon or an audio or video recording of a sermon, or subpoena a clergy member's attendance to testify regarding a sermon, for use in a civil or administrative action.

Acts 2009, ch. 573, § 1; 2015, ch. 472, § 1; 2018, ch. 663, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Baptizing O'Brien: Towards Intermediate Protection of Religiously Motivated Expressive Conduct, 68 Vand. L. Rev. 177 (2015).

4-1-408. Departments and agencies of state government to strive for economic efficiency.

Each department and agency of state government shall strive to achieve economic efficiency through utilization of innovative approaches and methodologies while maintaining the highest level of service for the citizens of Tennessee.

In achieving economic efficiency, each department and agency is encouraged to seek input and ideas from their employees and the general public. Each department and agency is encouraged to include a public comment portal on its website to facilitate such solicitations.

Each department and agency shall annually report progress in achieving economic efficiency during their budget hearings to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives.

Acts 2010, ch. 706, § 1.

4-1-409. Autism Awareness Recognition Day.

The governor shall designate one (1) day of each calendar year during the month of April as “Autism Awareness Recognition Day” in order to promote knowledge within the state's communities about the condition, the need for community services and appropriate medical treatment for the condition.

Acts 2011, ch. 226, § 1.

4-1-410. Tennessee's Day of Prayer.

The governor shall designate the first Thursday during the month of May of each calendar year as “Tennessee's Day of Prayer” on which the people of this state may turn to prayer, meditation or otherwise give thanks, in accordance with their own faiths and consciences.

Acts 2012, ch. 566, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 850, § 1 purported to enact §4-1-410. Section4-1-410 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 566, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 850, § 1 was designated as §4-1-411 by the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of legislation requiring governor to designate “Tennessee's Day of Prayer”. OAG 12-14, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (2/14/12).

4-1-411. Tennessee Genealogy Month.

The month of July each year shall be observed as “Tennessee Genealogy Month,” to be proclaimed as such by the governor.

Acts 2012, ch. 850, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 850, § 1 purported to enact §4-1-410. Section4-1-410 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 566, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 850, § 1 was designated as §4-1-411 by the code commission.

4-1-412. Tennessee heritage protection.

For purposes of this section:

“Commission” means the Tennessee historical commission;

“Historic conflict” means any war, battle, or military conflict in which citizens of the United States or any state or territory of the United States have participated in, including, but not limited to, the French and Indian War, American Revolution, War of 1812, United States-Mexican War, the War Between the States, Spanish American War, the Mexican border period, World War I, World War II, the Korean War, the Vietnam War, Operation Urgent Fury (Grenada), Operation El Dorado Canyon (Libya), Operation Just Cause (Panama), Operation Desert Shield/Desert Storm (Persian Gulf War I), Operation Enduring Freedom (Afghanistan), and Operation Iraqi Freedom (Persian Gulf War II);

“Historic entity” means any entity recognized as having state, national, military, or historical significance;

“Historic event” means any event recognized as having state, national, military, or historical significance;

“Historic figure” means any individual who has been recognized as having served in any historic conflict, historic event, historic entity, public office, or in public service;

“Historic organization” means any entity that has as one (1) or more of its material missions as the recognition or preservation of any historic conflict, historic entity, historic event, or historic figure;

“Memorial” means:

Any public real property or park, preserve, or reserve located on public property that has been named or dedicated in honor of any historic conflict, historic entity, historic event, historic figure, or historic organization; or

Any statue, monument, memorial, bust, nameplate, historical marker, plaque, artwork, flag, historic display, school, street, bridge, or building that has been erected for, named, or dedicated on public property in honor of any historic conflict, historic entity, historic event, historic figure, or historic organization; and

“Public property” means all property owned, leased, rented, managed, or maintained by or under the authority of this state, any county, municipality, metropolitan government, or any other public entity that is created by act of the general assembly to perform any public function.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no memorial regarding a historic conflict, historic entity, historic event, historic figure, or historic organization that is, or is located on, public property, may be removed, renamed, relocated, altered, rededicated, or otherwise disturbed or altered.

No memorial or public property that contains a memorial may be sold, transferred, or otherwise disposed of by a county, metropolitan government, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), a public entity having responsibility for maintaining a memorial, or a nonprofit entity acting with permission of the public entity, shall have the authority to take proper and appropriate measures, and exercise proper and appropriate means, for the care, preservation, protection, repair, restoration, and renovation of the memorial.

This subdivision (b)(3) shall not be construed to authorize:

Permanent removal or concealment of a memorial; or

Temporary removal or concealment of a memorial for a period exceeding forty-five (45) calendar days in any twelve-month period.

A public entity exercising control of a memorial may petition the commission for a waiver of subdivision (b)(1) or (b)(2), or both, if applicable. A public entity shall petition the commission for a waiver prior to undertaking any action or transaction, including any action or transaction involving a nonprofit entity or private party, that could foreseeably violate the restrictions imposed by this section.

The petition for waiver shall be in writing and shall state the basis upon which the waiver is sought. The petition shall be supported by one (1) or more reports showing that there is a material or substantial need for a waiver based on historical or other compelling public interest. The petition shall also identify by name and address any private entities, groups, or individuals, including, but not limited to, descendants, that may have an interest in receiving notice of the petition. The petition for waiver shall be filed with the commission with proof of public notice as required by subdivision (c)(3).

Prior to filing the petition for waiver, the public entity seeking a waiver shall publish notice of the petition for waiver on the website of the public entity, if any, and in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation serving the area of the memorial and one (1) in Davidson County. The notice shall state the basis on which the waiver is sought and shall provide that a copy of the petition and all supporting reports will be provided to any interested party at no cost upon written request submitted to the public entity filing or intending to file the petition for waiver.

An initial hearing before the commission on a petition for waiver shall be scheduled at any regular commission meeting no sooner than sixty (60) calendar days after a petition is filed. At the initial hearing, the commission shall determine which interested entities, groups, or individuals should be given written notice by the public entity, including copies of the petition and supporting reports. The public entity may be directed to provide supplemental notice by publication if deemed necessary by the commission. If an amendment to the petition is filed, the public entity shall provide supplemental notice. If supplemental notice is required either by the commission or as a result of an amendment, notice shall be given in the same manner as notice required pursuant to subdivision (c)(3).

A final hearing before the commission on a petition for waiver shall be scheduled at any regular commission meeting no sooner than one hundred eighty (180) calendar days after a petition is filed; provided, that if an amendment to the petition is filed, then no final hearing shall be scheduled until at least one hundred eighty (180) calendar days have elapsed from the date of the filing of the amendment.

An interested entity, group, or individual shall be afforded an opportunity to offer public comments regarding a petition for waiver at any commission hearing on a petition. An interested entity, group, or individual may file a memorandum, report, study, letter, or other document related to the petition for consideration by the commission. In addition, an interested entity, group, or individual may intervene in any petition for waiver by filing written notice with the commission not less than forty-five (45) calendar days prior to the final hearing. Upon filing notice, the interested entity, group, or individual shall be a party in all proceedings on the petition for waiver, shall receive copies of all filings, and may present relevant testimony and evidence at any hearing on the petition. Once notice is filed with the commission, the status of the interested entity, group, or individual as a party to the petition for waiver, and any subsequent or concurrent administrative or judicial proceedings, may only be waived in writing by the interested entity, group, or individual.

All hearings regarding a petition for waiver shall be recorded. Copies of the record and all exhibits shall be available to any interested entity, group, or individual at the cost of the public entity seeking the waiver.

In order for a waiver to be granted, the public entity seeking the waiver shall demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that a material or substantial need for a waiver based on historical or other compelling public interest exists; provided, that if a memorial is designated as a national historic landmark or listed on the national register of historic places, there shall be a presumption in favor of preservation of the memorial.

At the final hearing, the commission may grant a petition for waiver, in whole or in part, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire membership of the commission by roll call vote. The commission may include reasonable conditions and instructions to ensure that a memorial is preserved and remains publicly accessible to the greatest extent possible. Any petition for waiver that fails to receive a two-thirds (2/3) vote shall be denied. Within thirty (30) calendar days from the final hearing, the final determination of the commission shall be reduced to writing and shall state the commission's findings and the grounds on which the relief is granted or denied. The effective date of the determination shall be not less than one hundred twenty (120) calendar days after notice of the commission's determination is posted on the website of the commission. Copies of the final determination shall be sent to the public entity seeking the waiver and to each interested entity, group, or individual who testified or submitted evidence at the final hearing.

A public entity seeking a waiver or interested entity, group, or individual who intervened in accordance with subdivision (c)(6) who is aggrieved by the final determination of the commission on the petition for a waiver may file a petition for review in the chancery court of Davidson County or, alternatively, in the county in which the memorial is located or, in the case of a memorial that is located in multiple counties, the county in which the memorial is predominantly located. A petition for review shall be filed within sixty (60) calendar days after notice of the commission's determination is posted on the website of the commission. The court shall conduct a de novo review on the record of the issues. The review shall be conducted without a presumption that the determinations and findings of the commission are correct. Additional evidence may be introduced and considered by the court.

Any entity, group, or individual who can demonstrate a real interest in a memorial through aesthetic, architectural, cultural, economic, environmental, or historic injury, through petition for declaratory order, or through administrative involvement in either the waiver or complaint process, has standing to seek injunctive or other relief in chancery court of Davidson County to enforce this section. To the extent necessary to preserve the status of any memorial prior to a final determination on a waiver or complaint by the commission, administrative law judge, or chancery court, the court shall issue a restraining order or injunction to preserve the memorial and any related public property pending a final ruling on any request for injunctive relief. No bond or other security shall be required for any restraining order or other injunctive relief issued.

This section shall apply to any memorial in existence prior to January 1, 1970, and those lawfully created, erected, named, or dedicated on or after January 1, 1970.

This section shall not apply to any memorial located on public property under the control of, or acquired by, the department of transportation which may interfere with the construction, maintenance, or operation of the public transportation system. The department shall strive to ensure that any memorial is preserved to the greatest extent possible.

This section shall not apply to a memorial that has reached the end of its useful life and is approved for demolition by the state building commission in accordance with § 4-15-102; provided, that, prior to any decision to demolish a memorial designated as a national historic landmark or listed on the register of historic places, the historical commission shall make comments to the state building commission in accordance with § 4-11-111.

This section shall not apply to a memorial under the control of an accredited museum when:

Housed within the interior of the museum, or museum storage facility, located on public property; or

Exhibited or displayed on public property as part of a traveling or temporary exhibition, display, or loan.

This section shall not apply to a memorial under the control of a public library or public archive when:

Housed within the interior of the library or archive, or library or archive storage facility, located on public property; or

Exhibited or displayed on public property as part of a traveling or temporary exhibition, display, or loan.

The commission has authority to receive and consider complaints alleging violations of subdivision (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3)(B).

Complaints may be filed by any entity, group, or individual. All complaints must be in writing on a uniform complaint form to be posted on the website of the commission. Complaints must be filed within one hundred twenty (120) calendar days of the alleged violation.

A hearing on a complaint must be set within one hundred twenty (120) calendar days after the complaint is filed. Multiple complaints alleging the same violation must be joined. The complainant and public entity shall be given at least thirty (30) calendar days' notice of the date of the hearing. The complainant and the public entity shall be afforded the opportunity to present evidence at the hearing. At the hearing, the commission may determine that a violation has occurred by a majority vote of the entire membership of the commission; provided, that if the complainant is a member of the commission, the member shall not participate in the commission's deliberations or vote on the complaint. If a violation has occurred, the commission shall prepare a written violation determination. The complaint shall be deemed dismissed if a violation is not determined to have occurred at the hearing. Once acted upon, no complaint alleging the same, or substantially the same, violation by the same public entity during the same episode shall be received and considered by the commission unless initiated by the commission.

The commission shall transmit a copy of a violation determination to the public entity and to the department of economic and community development.

A public entity that violates any provision of this section shall be precluded from entering into grant contracts administered by the commission and the department of economic and community development for a period of five (5) years from the date upon which a violation determination is made.

The commission, at its discretion, may assist any public entity or historic organization with preservation of a memorial through consultation, best practices, or other available resources.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section, in lieu of a waiver, a historic organization may petition the commission to transfer ownership of, relocate, or both transfer ownership of and relocate, a memorial to the historic organization with the consent of the public entity exercising control over the memorial. The petition must be filed with a copy of a resolution, ordinance, or order from the governing body of the public entity consenting to the transfer, relocation, or both transfer and relocation. The petition must include an assessment of costs associated with the transfer, relocation, or both transfer and relocation, and identify who will be responsible for the costs. If the petition includes relocation, a description or map of the proposed location must be submitted with the petition. A memorial may be relocated only to an accessible and suitable location within this state as determined by the commission. The commission may approve a petition upon a majority vote of the entire membership of the commission.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, shall apply to this section except to the extent that the provisions of this section conflict, in which case this section shall control.

Acts 2013, ch. 75, § 2; 2016, ch. 601, § 2; 2017, ch. 201, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 1033, §§ 1-9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 75, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted §4-1-412, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Heritage Protection Act of 2013.”

A reference to “Korean Conflict” in subdivision (a)(1) has been changed to “Korean War” pursuant to Acts 2000, ch. 656, § 2.

Acts 2016, ch. 601, § 1, provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Heritage Protection Act of 2016.”

Acts 2016, ch. 601, § 3, provided that the act, which amended this section, is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed in favor of historical preservation.

Acts 2016, ch. 601, § 4, provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to petitions for waiver initiated with the Tennessee historical commission on or after March 11, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1033, § 10, provided that the act, which amended this section, is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed in favor of historical preservation.

4-1-413. Women in STEM month.

The month of August shall be designated “Women in STEM” month to raise awareness of the opportunities for women to pursue a career in a science, technology, engineering, and math (STEM) related field.

Acts 2014, ch. 935, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning encouraging women to pursue a career in STEM related fields, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 935.

4-1-414. Tennessee's Weekend of Prayer Over Students.

The governor shall designate the first weekend in August of each calendar year as “Tennessee's Weekend of Prayer Over Students” on which the people of this state may, in accordance with their own faith and consciences, turn to prayer, meditation, or otherwise give thanks for the students of this state as well as their teachers, administrators, and schools.

Acts 2015, ch. 298, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning prayer for the students of Tennessee, see Acts 2015, ch. 298, § 2.

4-1-415. Tennessee Archaeology Awareness Month.

The month of September shall be designated “Tennessee Archaeology Awareness Month” to encourage all citizens to learn more about prehistoric and historic archaeology in Tennessee.

Acts 2015, ch. 28, § 1.

4-1-416. Carbon Monoxide Awareness Day.

September 18 of each calendar year shall be designated “Carbon Monoxide Awareness Day” to bring awareness to the dangers of carbon monoxide.

Acts 2015, ch. 111, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the legislative purpose for Carbon Monoxide Awareness Day, see Acts 2015, ch. 111.

4-1-417. Lung Cancer Awareness Month.

The month of November each year shall be designated as “Lung Cancer Awareness Month” in order to promote knowledge within the state concerning lung cancer diagnosis, treatment, and research.

Acts 2015, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the need for Tennesseeans to be better informed about diagnosis, treatment and research relative to lung cancer, see Acts 2015, ch. 299.

4-1-418. Tennessee Tri-Star General Award.

There is established an award to be known as the “Tennessee Tri-Star General Award.”

The governor may recognize distinguished individuals who have a record of outstanding service to this state or a local subdivision of this state by awarding such individuals the Tennessee Tri-Star General Award. The award shall honor individuals who have demonstrated a high level of service, including, but not limited to: volunteer work or community service; public service; military service; leadership; or charitable, business, or scientific contributions.

Each member of the general assembly may submit one (1) nomination for the award to the governor each calendar year.

The governor may recognize with the award up to five (5) individuals who are not nominated by the general assembly each calendar year.

Nominees must have resided in this state for at least five (5) years.

The award may recognize an individual posthumously; provided, that the individual satisfies all other requirements in this section.

Individuals recognized pursuant to this section shall bear the honorary title of “Tennessee Tri-Star General”. The award shall consist of a certificate bearing the great seal of the state of Tennessee and be signed by the governor and secretary of state.

Acts 2016, ch. 920, § 1.

4-1-419. Tennessee craft beer and cider month.

The month of April is designated as “Tennessee Craft Beer and Cider Month” in recognition of the contributions of Tennessee craft breweries and cideries to this state's economic growth and diversification.

Acts 2017, ch. 136, § 1.

4-1-420. Reelfoot Lake designated Tennessee Heritage Site.

Reelfoot Lake is designated as a Tennessee Heritage Site.

A department or agency of this state may use the terms “Reelfoot Lake” or “Tennessee Heritage Site,” or both, for purposes of publications, advertisements, marketing, and other communications.

Acts 2019, ch. 443, § 1.